Connecticut, session 2026, HB05217.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 4-5 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2028):
As used in sections 4-6, 4-7 and 4-8, the term "department head"
means the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management,
Commissioner of Administrative Services, Commissioner of Revenue
Services, Banking Commissioner, Commissioner of Children and
Families, Commissioner of Consumer Protection, Commissioner of
Correction, Commissioner of Economic and Community Development,
[State Board of Education] Commissioner of Education, Commissioner
of Emergency Services and Public Protection, Commissioner of Energy
and Environmental Protection, Commissioner of Agriculture,
Commissioner of Public Health, Insurance Commissioner, Labor
Commissioner, Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction
Services, Commissioner of Social Services, Commissioner of
Developmental Services, Commissioner of Motor Vehicles,
LCO No. 1407 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5217
Commissioner of Transportation, Commissioner of Veterans Affairs,
Commissioner of Housing, Commissioner of Aging and Disability
Services, Commissioner of Early Childhood, Commissioner of Health
Strategy, executive director of the Office of Military Affairs, executive
director of the Technical Education and Career System, Chief Workforce
Officer and Commissioner of Higher Education. [As used in sections 4-
6 and 4-7, "department head" also means the Commissioner of
Education.]
Sec. 2. Section 10-3a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2028):
(a) There shall be a Department of Education. [which shall serve as
the administrative arm of the State Board of Education.] The department
shall be under the direction of the Commissioner of Education, [whose
appointment shall be recommended to] who shall be appointed by the
Governor [by the State Board of Education] for a term of four years to
be coterminous with the term of the Governor. Such appointment shall
be in accordance with the provisions of sections 4-5 to 4-7, inclusive, as
amended by this act. The Commissioner of Education shall be the
[administrative officer] department head of the department and shall
administer, coordinate and supervise the activities of the department.
[in accordance with the policies established by the board.]
(b) The [State Board of Education] Commissioner of Education shall
organize the Department of Education into such bureaus, divisions and
other units as may be necessary for the efficient conduct of the business
of the department, and may, from time to time, create, abolish, transfer
or consolidate within the department any bureau, division or other unit
as may be necessary for the efficient conduct of the business of [said
board] the department. Upon such organization or reorganization the
[board] commissioner shall adopt regulations pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 54. The [board] commissioner may create such
advisory boards as it deems necessary for the efficient conduct of the
business of the department.
LCO No. 1407 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5217
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2028 4-5
Sec. 2 July 1, 2028 10-3a